apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 1116
	Sdefs: 63
	Paradigms: 126
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools fix apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix out.dix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>АБВГҐДЕЄЖЗИІЇЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЦЧШЩЮЯЬабвгґдеєжзиіїйклмнопрстуфхцчшщюяь</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" 	c="іменник"/> 
    <sdef n="adj" 	c="Прикметник"/> 
    <sdef n="f" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="m" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="nt" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="mf"  c=""/> 
    <sdef n="mfn" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="aa"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="an"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="nn"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="однина"/> 
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="множина"/> 
    <sdef n="nom" 	c="називний"/> 
    <sdef n="gen" 	c="родовий"/> 
    <sdef n="dat" 	c="давальний"/> 
    <sdef n="acc" 	c="знахідний"/> 
    <sdef n="ins" 	c="орудний"/> 
    <sdef n="loc" 	c="місцевий"/> 
    <sdef n="voc" 	c="кличний"/> 
    <sdef n="indecl" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ind"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="det"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="dem"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="qnt"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="rel"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="itg"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="neg"   c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ref" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pprep" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="p1" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="p2" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="p3" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pr" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="adv" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pos" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ij" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="дієслово"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c="дієслово бути"/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="дієслово мати"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"   c="модальне дієслово"/>
    <sdef n="imperf" 	c="недоконаний вид"/> 
    <sdef n="perf" 	c="недоконан вид"/>
    <sdef n="tv"    c="перехідне дієслово"/>
    <sdef n="iv"    c="неперехідне дієслово"/>
    <sdef n="fut" 	c="майбутній час"/> 
    <sdef n="pers" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cni" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="imp" 	c="наказовий спосіб"/> 
    <sdef n="impers" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="inf" 	c="Інфінітив"/> 
    <sdef n="past" 	c="минулий час"/> 
    <sdef n="pp" 	  c=""/> 
    <sdef n="psv" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pprs" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="act" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pres" 	c="теперішній час"/> 
    <sdef n="num" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="np" 	  c=""/> 
    <sdef n="top" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ant" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cog" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="hyd" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cpd" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="sint" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="comp" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="sup" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="sent" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="sp" 	  c=""/> 
    <sdef n="vaux" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="part"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="cm"         c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"       c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"       c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"      c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"      c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio"       c="Hyphen"/>

  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)? ?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><i>-</i><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[:.][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quantitats">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>км</l><r><b/>км<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>мм</l><r><b/>мм<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>см</l><r><b/>см<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>кг</l><r><b/>kг<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guio">
      <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


<pardef n="BASE__англійський">
  <e>       <p><l>ий</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ого</l>       <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ому</l>       <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ий</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ого</l>       <r><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>им</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ім</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ому</l>       <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ий</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l>         <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ої</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ій</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l>         <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ою</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ій</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l>         <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ого</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ому</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>им</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ім</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ому</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>их</l>        <r><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>их</l>        <r><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>им</l>        <r><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ими</l>       <r><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>их</l>        <r><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="про__pr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="можна__vaux">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vaux"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="де__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="тільки__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="а__cnjcoo">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/і__cnjcoo">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>і</l>          <r>і<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>й</l>          <r>і<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>і</l>      <r>і<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="то__cnjsub">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="якщо__cnjadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="можна">           <i>можна</i><par n="можна__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="iз">              <i>iз</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="без">             <i>без</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="для">             <i>для</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="до">              <i>до</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="з">               <i>з</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="з-під">           <i>з-під</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="під">             <i>під</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="зовні">           <i>зовні</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="на">              <i>на</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="напередодні">     <i>напередодні</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="о">        <i>о</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="о">        <p><l>об</l>        <r>о</r></p><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="про">             <i>про</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="після">           <i>після</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="спасибі за">      <i>спасибо<b/>за</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="усередині">       <i>усередині</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="із-за">           <i>із-за</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="навпроти">        <i>навпроти</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="за">              <i>за</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="від">             <i>від</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="по">              <i>по</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="у">               <i>у</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
<e lm="де">              <i>де</i><par n="де__adv"/></e>
<e lm="тільки">          <i>тільки</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="як">              <i>як</i><par n="де__adv"/></e>
<e lm="сьогодні">        <i>сьогодні</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="вчора">           <i>вчора</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="дуже">            <i>дуже</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="куди">            <i>куди</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="коли">            <i>коли</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="холодно">         <i>холодно</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="уважно">          <i>уважно</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="тепло">           <i>тепло</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="раптом">          <i>раптом</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="напевно">         <i>напевно</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="звичайно">        <i>звичайно</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="завжди">          <i>завжди</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="далі">            <i>далі</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="також">           <i>також</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="швидко">          <i>швидко</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ближче">          <i>ближче</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="чому">            <i>чому</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="просто">          <i>просто</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="уже">             <i>уже</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="дома">            <i>дома</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
<e lm="а">               <i>а</i><par n="а__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="і">               <i></i><par n="/і__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="або">             <i>або</i><par n="а__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="але">             <i>але</i><par n="а__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="та">              <i>та</i><par n="а__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="то">              <i>то</i><par n="то__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="хоча">            <i>хоча</i><par n="то__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="поки">            <i>поки</i><par n="якщо__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="після того, як">  <i>після<b/>того,<b/>як</i><par n="якщо__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="так як">          <i>так<b/>як</i><par n="якщо__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="тому що">         <i>тому<b/>що</i><par n="якщо__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="щоб">             <i>щоб</i><par n="якщо__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="все-таки">        <i>все-таки</i><par n="якщо__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="якщо">            <i>якщо</i><par n="якщо__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="не">              <i>не</i><par n="тільки__adv"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="guio"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
